Maryland, session 2026, HB0565.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
3–301.
(a) The Calvert County Board consists of five voting members and one nonvoting
student member.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0565*

HOUSE BILL 565
(d) Of the five voting members of the county board:
(1) One shall be elected from each of the three county commissioner
districts BY A PLURALITY OF THE VOTES CAST WITHIN THAT DISTRICT; and
(2) Two shall be elected from the county at large.
3–4A–01.
(a) The Cecil County Board consists of six members as follows:
(1) One voting member elected from each of the five commissioner districts;
and
(2) One nonvoting student member.
(b) The five voting members of the county board shall be elected [at]:
(1) AT a general election as required by subsection (c) of this section; AND
(2) BY A PLURALITY OF THE VOTES CAST WITHIN EACH RESPECTIVE
COMMISSIONER DISTRICT.
3–601.
(b) The Garrett County Board consists of:
(1) One elected member from each county commissioner district;
(2) Two elected members from the county at large; and
(3) One nonvoting student member.
(d) (1) Elected members of the board shall be elected [at]:
(I) AT a general election as required by subsection (e) of this section;
AND
(II) FOR THE MEMBERS ELECTED FROM EACH COUNTY
COMMISSIONER DISTRICT, BY A PLURALITY OF THE VOTES CAST WITHIN THAT
COMMISSIONER DISTRICT.
3–901.
(b) The Montgomery County Board consists of:

HOUSE BILL 565 3
(1) 5 elected members, each of whom resides in a different board of
education district;
(2) 2 elected members who may reside anywhere in the county; and
(3) 1 student member.
(f) (2) (I) [Elected] THE ELECTED members of the county board WHO
MAY RESIDE ANYWHERE IN THE COUNTY shall be elected by the voters of the entire
county.
(II) THE ELECTED MEMBERS FROM EACH OF THE BOARD OF
EDUCATION DISTRICTS SHALL BE ELECTED BY A PLURALITY OF THE VOTES CAST
WITHIN THAT BOARD OF EDUCATION DISTRICT.
3–10A–01.
(a) The Queen Anne’s County Board consists of:
(1) Five voting, nonpartisan, elected members; and
(2) One nonvoting student representative from each public high school in
the county.
(b) The five voting, nonpartisan, elected members shall be elected [by the voters
of the entire county] at a general election in accordance with subsection (c) of this section
AS FOLLOWS:
(1) FOR THE MEMBER ELECTED FROM THE COUNTY AT LARGE, BY
THE VOTERS OF THE ENTIRE COUNTY; AND
(2) FOR THE MEMBERS ELECTED FROM EACH OF THE FOUR COUNTY
COMMISSIONER DISTRICTS, BY A PLURALITY OF THE VOTES CAST WITHIN THAT
DISTRICT.
(c) (1) (i) One voting member shall reside in and be elected from each of
the four county commissioner districts; and
(ii) One member shall reside in the county and be elected from the
county at large.
3–1101.
(e) (1) The St. Mary’s County Board consists of five voting members who shall
be elected as follows:

HOUSE BILL 565
(i) One member shall be elected from the county at large; and
(ii) One member shall be elected from each of the four commissioner
districts.
(2) Voting members of the county board shall be elected:
(i) At a general election as required by this section; and
(ii) 1. [On] FOR THE MEMBER ELECTED FROM THE COUNTY
AT LARGE, ON a general countywide ticket; AND
2. FOR THE MEMBERS ELECTED FROM EACH OF THE
FOUR COMMISSIONER DISTRICTS, BY A PLURALITY OF THE VOTES CAST WITHIN
THAT DISTRICT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act:
(1) shall be applicable to the elections for county boards of education in
which members are elected from individual districts held in 2028 and all subsequent
elections; and
(2) may not be construed to affect the tenure of an elected member of a
county board of education who is elected from an individual district serving in office before
the beginning of the next regular full term of office that begins after the effective date of
this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.